Illinois, session 104th, SB597.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Restroom Access Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 39/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Restroom Access Act.9(Source: P.A. 94-450, eff. 8-4-05.)